California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 or to permit any return or report, or copy thereof, or any fee billing or book containing any abstract or particulars thereof, to be seen or examined by any person not expressly authorized by subdivision (a) and this subdivision. However, the Governor may, by general or special order, authorize examination of the records maintained by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration under this part by other state officers, by tax officers of another state, by the federal government, if a reciprocal arrangement exists, or by any other person. The information so obtained pursuant to the order of the Governor shall not be made public except to the extent and in the manner that the order may authorize that it be made public.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the successors, receivers, trustees, executors, administrators, assignees, and guarantors, if directly interested, may be given information regarding the determination of any unpaid tax or the amount of taxes, interest, or penalties required to be collected or assessed.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or increasing the public’s access to information on any aspect of hazardous or extremely hazardous waste generation or disposal collected pursuant to other state or local laws, regulations, or ordinances.

 (f) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), a feepayer may be given otherwise confidential information, subject to the limitations provided in the Information Practices Act
 of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), about another feepayer to the extent the information is necessary to establish that the feepayer is responsible for paying the Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Fee imposed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 105275) of Division 103 of the Health and Safety Code due to their historical association with that feepayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 155.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 22.1. HAZARDOUS SPILL PREVENTION FEE LAW [43800. - 43810.]

43800.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Hazardous Spill Prevention Fee Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43801.

The collection and administration of the fee imposed by Article 10 (commencing with Section 7710) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of the Public Utilities Code shall be governed by the definitions specified in Section 7710 of the Public Utilities Code, unless expressly superseded by the definitions contained in this part or Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43802.

“Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43803.

“Director” means the Director of Toxic Substances Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43804.

“Hazardous material” means any of the following:

(1) A hazardous material as defined in Section 172 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) A hazardous material as defined in Section 25501 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) A hazardous material as defined in Section 2402.7 of the Vehicle Code.

(4) A hazardous material as defined in Section 1160.3 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43805.

“Hazardous waste” has the same meaning as defined in Section 25117 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43806.

(a) “Surface transporter” means any surface transporter required to pay the fee established pursuant to Section 7714.5 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department may, by regulation, revise the definition of the term “surface transporter” for purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43807.

The fee imposed on surface transporters of hazardous materials pursuant to Section 7714.5 of the Public Utilities Code shall be administered and collected by the board in accordance with this part and Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of this code, and shall be due and payable as follows:

(a) The fee to be paid by motor carriers is due and payable on the last day of December for each state fiscal year.

(b) The fee to
 be paid by railroads is due and payable within 30 days from the date of assessment and the feepayer shall deliver a remittance of the amount of the assessed fee to the office of the board within that 30-day period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43808.

All fees, interest, and penalties imposed and all amounts of fees required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 43807 shall be paid to the board in the form of remittance payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Hazardous Spill Prevention Account in the Railroad Accident Prevention and Response Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

43810.

Notwithstanding Section 55381, for purposes of the fee administered under Section 43807, “department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1223, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 22.5.  [44000. - 44007.]

44000.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Marine Invasive Species Fee Collection Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 491, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

44001.

For purposes of this part, “department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 156.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44002.

The collection and administration of the fee imposed by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71215) of Division 36 of the Public Resources Code shall be governed by the definitions specified in Section 71200 of the Public Resources Code, unless expressly superseded by the definitions contained in this part or Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 110, Sec. 1.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44003.

The fee imposed on owners or operators of vessels pursuant to Section 71215 of the Public Resources Code shall be administered and collected by the department in accordance with this part and Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 157.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44004.

Every person, as defined in Section 55002, who is subject to the fees imposed by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 71215) of Division 36 of the Public Resources Code shall register with the department on forms or in a manner provided by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 158.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44005.

Except as authorized in Section 44006, the fee imposed on owners or operators of vessels pursuant to Section 71215 of the Public Resources Code is due and payable to the department 30 days from the date of assessment by the department or the department’s agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 159.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44006.

In order to facilitate the administration of this part and in lieu of issuing an assessment for the fee, the department may authorize the feepayer to file a return for a monthly, quarterly, or other period set by the department. The return shall identify each vessel voyage and each port of call in California for which a ballast water report is required to be filed with the State Lands Commission, pursuant to Section 71205 of the Public Resources Code, during the period covered by the return. If the department authorizes the filing of a return, the fees must be paid to the department by the end of the calendar month following the end of the return reporting period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 160.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44007.

All fees, interest, and penalties imposed and all fees required to be paid to the state pursuant to Section 71215 of the Public Resources Code shall be paid in the form of remittances payable to the department. The department shall transmit the payments to the Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Marine Invasive Species Control Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 161.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 23. INTEGRATED WASTE MANAGEMENT FEE LAW [45001. - 45984.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [45001. - 45009.]

45001.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the Integrated Waste Management Fee Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 42.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45002.

The collection and administration of the fee imposed pursuant to Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code shall be governed by the definitions contained in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 40100) of Part 1 of Division 30 of the Public Resources Code, unless expressly superseded by the definitions contained in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 43.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45003.

Except where the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45004.

The provisions of this part, insofar as they are substantially the same as existing provisions of law relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations and not as new enactments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45005.

Any action or proceeding commenced before this part takes effect, or any right accrued, is not affected by this part, but all procedures taken shall conform to this part as far as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45006.

“Person” includes any individual, firm, cooperative organization, fraternal organization, corporation, limited liability company, estate, trust, business trust receiver, trustee, syndicate, this state, any county, city and county, municipality, district, public agency, or subdivision of this state or any other group or combination acting as a unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1200, Sec. 75.   Effective September 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

45007.

“Board” or “department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 88.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

45008.

“In this state” means within the exterior limits of the State of California and includes all territory within those limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1319, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

45009.

“Fee payer” means any person who is liable for payment of the fee imposed pursuant to Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 44.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. The Integrated Waste Management Fee [45051. - 45102.]



  ARTICLE 1. Imposition of Fee [45051. - 45051.]

45051.

The fee imposed pursuant to Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code shall be administered and collected by the board in accordance with this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 46.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration and Security [45101. - 45102.]

45101.

Every person who operates a solid waste landfill required to have a solid waste facilities permit pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 44001) of Part 4 of the Public Resources Code shall register with the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 656, Sec. 48.   Effective October 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

45102.

The board, whenever it deems it necessary to ensure compliance with this part, may require any person subject to this part to place with it any security that the board determines to be reasonable, taking into account the circumstances of that person. Any security in the form of cash, government bonds, or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions shall be held by the board in trust to be used solely in the manner provided by this section. The board may sell the security at public auction if it becomes necessary to do so in order to recover
 any fee or any amount required to be collected, including any interest or penalty due. Notice of the sale shall be served upon the person who placed the security personally or by mail.

If service is made by mail, the notice shall be addressed to the person at his or her address as it appears in the records of the board. Service shall be made at least 30 days prior to the sale in the case of personal service, and at least 40 days prior to the sale in the case of service by mail. Upon any sale, any surplus above the amounts due shall be returned to the person who placed the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 903, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Determinations [45151. - 45353.]



  ARTICLE 1. Reports and Payments [45151. - 45158.]

45151.

(a) The fee imposed pursuant to Section 48000 of the Public Resources Code is due and payable to the board quarterly on or before the 25th day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the fee is due. Each feepayer shall prepare a return in the form as prescribed by the board, which may include, but not be limited to, electronic media, showing the total amount of solid waste subject to the fee, the amount of fee for the period covered by the return, and any other information that the board determines to be
 necessary. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the board.

(b) The feepayer shall deliver the return, together with a remittance of the amount of fee due, to the office of the board on or before the 25th day of the calendar month following the quarterly period for which the fee is due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

45152.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the board for good cause may extend, for not to exceed one month, the time for making any report or return or paying any amount required to be paid under this part. The extension may be granted at any time if a request therefor is filed with the board within or prior to the period for which the extension may be granted.

(b) (1) In the case of a disaster, the board, for a period not to exceed three months, may extend the time for making any report or return or paying any fee required under this part. The extension may be granted at any time provided a request therefor is filed with the board within or before the period for which the extension may be granted.

(2) For purposes of this section, “disaster” means fire, flood, storm, tidal wave, earthquake, or similar public calamity, whether or not resulting from natural causes.

(c) Any person to whom an extension is granted shall pay, in addition to the fee, interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5 from the date on which the fee would have been due without the extension until the date of
 payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 257, Sec. 10.   (AB 1559)   Effective September 9, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

45152.5.

(a) Subject to subdivision (c), the Governor issues a state of emergency proclamation, the department may extend the time, for a period not to exceed three months, for making any report or return or paying any fee required under this part for any person in an area identified in the state of emergency proclamation.

(b) If the department makes an extension pursuant to subdivision (a), any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation shall not be required to file a request for the extension. 

(c) The department may make the extension in subdivision (a) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of
 the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 74.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45153.

(a) Any person who fails to pay any fee to the state or any amount of fee required to be paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 45201), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fee or amount of the fee in addition to the fee or amount of the fee, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the fee or the amount of the fee required to be paid
 became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(b) Any person who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section 45151, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the surcharge with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the surcharge for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 159, Sec. 186.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

45153.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the fee was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of the fee was made one business day after the date the fee was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that fee payment.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5, determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section does not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where a return has not been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.

(e) This section only applies to electronic payments of fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 162.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

45155.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 45153, 45160, and 45306.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c) and (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement, under penalty of perjury, setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department
 may grant relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 75.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45156.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of interest provided for by Sections 45152, 45153, 45160, and 45201.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a person seeking to be relieved of interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area identified
 in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 76.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

45156.5.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay fees is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the
 feepayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on fee liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

45157.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the fees imposed or administered under this part and any penalty or interest added thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely report or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to the fee under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to the fee, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to the fee.

(3) The liability for fees applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of the
 rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be
 entitled to rely on the board’s written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 987, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

45158.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A fee liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of fee liability is
 attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the fee reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported fee liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in fee attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for the fee (including
 interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of the fee.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar quarters subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar quarter that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know”
 means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as an operator of a facility for disposal of solid waste to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as an operator, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for any
 unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.1. Payment by Electronic Funds Transfer [45160. - 45163.]

45160.

(a) Any person whose estimated fee liability under this part averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, as determined by the board pursuant to methods of calculation prescribed by the board, shall remit amounts due by an electronic funds transfer under procedures prescribed by the board.

(b) Any person whose estimated fee liability under this part averages less than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per month may elect to remit
 amounts due by electronic funds transfer with the approval of the board.

(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 45151). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting fees by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the board. Any person
 who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of fees with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit fees pursuant to this article who remits those fees by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fees incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any fee to the state or any amount of fee required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 45201), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the fee or amount of fee, in addition to the fee or amount of fee, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the fee became due and payable
 to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated fee liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the fees due for any one return. Any person remitting fees by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 45153.

(i) The board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 18.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

45161.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 45160. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases
 his or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

45162.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of the fee. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person
 through his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 45160 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

45163.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return, declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original
 document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiency Determinations [45201. - 45203.]

45201.

(a) If the department is dissatisfied with the report or return filed or the amount of fee paid to the state by any fee payer, or if no report or return has been filed or no payment or payments of the fees have been made to the state by a fee payer, the department may compute and determine the amount to be paid, based upon any information available to it. One or more additional determinations may be made of the amount of fee due for one, or for more than one, period. The amount of fee so determined shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date the amount of the fee, or any portion thereof, became due and payable until the date of payment. In making a determination, the department may offset
 overpayments for a period or periods against underpayments for another period or periods and against the interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(b) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is made is found to have been occasioned by negligence or intentional disregard of this part or regulations adopted by the department pursuant to this part, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of that determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (a).

(c) If any part of the deficiency for which a determination of an additional amount due is made is found to be occasioned by fraud or an intent to evade this part or authorized regulations, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added, plus interest as provided in subdivision (a).

(d) The department shall give to the fee payer written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(1) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the fee payer at their address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in a United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, mail chute, or other facility regularly maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(2) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service made pursuant to this paragraph shall be deemed complete at the time of delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated